Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 4. Relations of Partners to
Each Other and to Partnership

§ 17-21-401.
Partner's rights and duties.

A partnership shall establish an account for each partner which shall be credited with an amount equal to the cash plus the value of any other property, net of the amount of any liabilities, the partner contributes to the partnership and the partner’s share of the partnership profits. Each partner’s account shall be charged with an amount equal to the cash plus the value of any other property, net of the amount of any liabilities, distributed by the partnership to the partner and the partner’s share of the partnership losses provided that the partner shall be personally liable on account of such charges only as provided in W.S.

17-21-807

and

17-21-808

.

A partnership shall credit each partner’s account with an equal share of the partnership profits and shall charge each partner with a share of the partnership losses, whether capital or operating, as provided in W.S.

17-21-808

, in proportion to the partner’s share of the profits.

A partnership shall indemnify each partner for payments reasonably made and liabilities reasonably incurred by the partner in the ordinary and proper conduct of the business of the partnership or for the preservation of its business or property, provided, however, that no other partner shall be required to make any payment to the partnership or any other partner, except as provided to the partnership or any other partner, except as provided in W.S.

17-21-807

and

17-21-808

, including any payments attributable all or in part to partnership liabilities for indemnification.

A partnership shall repay a partner who, in aid of the partnership, makes a payment or advance beyond the amount of capital the partner agreed to contribute.

A payment made by a partner which gives rise to a partnership obligation under subsection (c) or (d) of this section constitutes a loan to the partnership. Interest accrues from the date of the payment or advance.

Each partner has equal rights in the management and conduct of the partnership business.

A partner may use or possess partnership property only on behalf of the partnership.

A partner is not entitled to remuneration for services performed for the partnership, except for reasonable compensation for services rendered in winding up the business of the partnership.

A person may become a partner only with the consent of all the partners.

A difference arising as to a matter in the ordinary course of business of a partnership may be decided by a majority of the partners. An act outside the ordinary course of business of a partnership and an amendment to the partnership agreement may be undertaken only with the consent of all the partners.

This section does not affect the obligations of a partnership to other persons under W.S.

17-21-301

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 1998, ch. 85, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

There was sufficient evidence for the district court to find that no partnership existed between the spouses, and therefore this section, which outlines the rights and duties of partners, had no application to the resolution of the division of marital property. Barton v. Barton, 996 P.2d 1,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2000).

Breach of partner's duty. —

When a partner acquires property contrary to his fiduciary duty, he is held to be a trustee of the property for the partnership's benefit. Lutz v. Schmillen, 899 P.2d 861,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995), (decided under former § 17-13-404).

While it is acknowledged that the partnership relationship does not preclude a partner's procurement of realty interests in his own right and with his own funds, the partner can do so only as long as the partnership does not suffer any disadvantage and the partner who is making the purchase does not reap any individual advantage from his position as a partner. Lutz v. Schmillen, 899 P.2d 861,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995), (decided under former § 17-13-404).

When a partner obtains financing for the development of real property in the course of a plan which had been originally pursued by the partnership for the same purpose, excluding other partners from participating further in the originally intended project, the partner has intercepted a partnership opportunity in breach of his fiduciary duty to the partnership. Lutz v. Schmillen, 899 P.2d 861,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995), (decided under former § 17-13-404).

Employee receiving worker's compensation benefits cannot sue. —

An individual partner enjoys the same immunity as the partnership from a suit by an injured partnership employee who has received worker's compensation benefits through the partnership's contribution. Brebaugh v. Hales, 788 P.2d 1128,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1990) (decided under former § 17-13-401).

A partnership employee who has received worker's compensation benefits for a work-related injury may not maintain a tort action against an individual partner who manages the partnership's day-to-day operations under a contract with the partnership. The managing partner is an employer for purposes of the immunity provisions of the worker's compensation law. Pool v. Dravo Coal Co., 788 P.2d 1146,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1990) (decided under former § 17-13-401).

Partners' share where partnership agreement silent as to cash advances. —

This section evidences a presumption that additional amounts paid by a partner, over and above the capital contributions recited in the partnership agreement or agreed to, are presumed to be loans to the partnership, with interest payable from the date of the advance; therefore, district court's calculation of dissociated partner's share was improper because the cash advances by the other partners were to be treated as loans where the partnership agreement was silent on the matter. Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted

in

B & R Builders v. Beilgard, 915 P.2d 1195,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1996); Rosenbaum v. State, 915 P.2d 1200,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Determining the Existence of a Partnership,” see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1021 (1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Provision for disposition of partner's interest on death of partner as affecting validity of contract, 1 ALR2d 1178.

Construction and application of Uniform Partnership Act as to rights of parties where business is continued after a partner retires or dies, 2 ALR2d 1084.

Partner of debtor as necessary party defendant to action to set aside conveyance in fraud of creditors, 24 ALR2d 395.

Powers and duties of managing partner of mining partnership, 24 ALR2d 1359.

Action against surviving partner for profits earned subsequent to death or dissolution, 55 ALR2d 1391.

Accounting as remedy with respect to rights in profits earned by partnership after death or dissolution, 55 ALR2d 1391.

Construction and effect of agreement relating to salary of partner, 66 ALR2d 1023.

Rights of surviving members and estate of deceased member of law firm in respect to business unfinished at time of latter's death, 78 ALR2d 280.

Construction and application of expulsion provision in partnership agreement between attorneys, 72 ALR3d 1226.

Joint venturers' comparative liability for losses, in absence of express agreement, 51 ALR4th 371.

§ 17-21-402.
Distributions in kind.

A partner has no right to receive and may not be required to accept a distribution in kind.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-403.
Partner's right to information.

A partnership shall keep its books and records, if any, at its chief executive office.

A partnership shall provide partners and their agents and attorneys access to its books and records. It shall provide former partners and their agents and attorneys access to books and records pertaining to the period during which they were partners. The right of access provides the opportunity to inspect and copy books and records during ordinary business hours. A partnership may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of documents furnished.

Each partner and the partnership, on demand, shall furnish to a partner and the legal representative of a deceased partner or partner under legal disability, to the extent just and reasonable, complete and accurate information concerning the partnership.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Court order for examining and copying records. —

In action for money due on purchase price of partnership interest, district court's orders for examination and copying of certain partnership books and records by plaintiff were not improper and prejudicial in view of disputes as to value of partnership business and amounts paid on purchase price, and defendant's concession that plaintiff used none of evidence found. Swanson v. Johnson, 58 Wyo. 1, 122 P.2d 423,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1942).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 962 to 970, 1045 to 1060.

Right of partner to accounting where firm business or transactions are illegal, 32 ALR2d 1345.

Venue of action for partnership accounting, 33 ALR2d 914.

When statute of limitations commences to run on right of partnership accounting, 44 ALR4th 678.

68 C.J.S. Partnership § 92.

§ 17-21-404.
General standards of partner's conduct.

The only fiduciary duties a partner owes to the partnership and the other partners are the duty of loyalty and the duty of care set forth in this section.

A partner’s duty of loyalty to the partnership and the other partners is limited to the following:

To account to the partnership and hold as trustee for it any property, profit or benefit derived by the partner, without the consent of the other partners, in the conduct and winding up of the partnership business or from a use or appropriation by the partner of partnership property or opportunity;

To refrain from dealing with the partnership in the conduct or winding up of the partnership business, as or on behalf of a party having an interest adverse to the partnership without the consent of the other partners; and

To refrain from competing with the partnership in the conduct of the partnership business without the consent of the other partners before the dissolution of the partnership.

A partner’s duty of loyalty may not be eliminated by agreement, but the partners may by agreement identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty, if not manifestly unreasonable.

A partner’s duty of care to the partnership and the other partners in the conduct and winding up of the partnership business is limited to refraining from engaging in grossly negligent or reckless conduct, intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law.

A partner shall discharge the duties to the partnership and the other partners under this chapter or under the partnership agreement, and exercise any rights, consistent with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing. The obligation of good faith and fair dealing may not be eliminated by agreement but the partners may by agreement determine the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured, if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

A partner does not violate a duty or obligation under this chapter or under the partnership agreement merely because the partner’s conduct furthers the partner’s own interest. A partner may lend money to and transact other business with the partnership. The rights and obligations of a partner who lends money to or transacts business with the partnership are the same as those of a person who is not a partner, subject to other applicable law.

This section applies to a person winding up the partnership business as the personal or legal representative of the last surviving partner as if the person were a partner.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Derivative action.—

Limited partners’ complaint failed to state any facts entitling them to relief in a direct action because they sought relief for an injury to the limited partnership; the alleged breach of fiduciary duty had to be remedied through a derivative action because the partners’ alleged injury stemmed from the deceased general partner’s breach of fiduciary duties he owed to them, but they failed to identify how that injury was independent of the limited partnership’s injury. Fritchel v. White, 2019 WY 117, 452 P.3d 601,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2019).

General partner's duties. —

Limited partnership's general partner was not liable to a limited partner for breach of fiduciary duty for engaging in transactions with third parties because the transactions (1) achieved the purposes of the partnership, and (2) were engaged in in good faith, as the general partner did not compete with or benefit from partnership property.
Wallop Canyon Ranch, LLC v. Goodwyn, 2015 WY 81, 351 P.3d 943,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2015).

Quoted

in

Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Partner's breach of fiduciary duty to copartner on sale of partnership interest to another partner, 4 ALR4th 1122.

§ 17-21-405.
Partner's liability to partnership.

A partner is liable to the partnership for a breach of the partnership agreement or for the violation of any duty to the partnership causing harm to the partnership.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-406.
Remedies of partnership and partners.

A partnership may maintain an action against a partner for a breach of the partnership agreement or for the violation of any duty to the partnership causing harm to the partnership.

A partner may maintain an action against the partnership or another partner for legal or equitable relief, including an accounting as to partnership business, to:

Enforce a right under the partnership agreement;

Enforce a right under this chapter, including:

The partner’s rights under W.S.

17-21-401

,

17-21-403

and

17-21-404

;

The partner’s right on dissociation to have the partner’s interest in the partnership purchased pursuant to W.S.

17-21-701

or enforce any other right under article 6 or 7 of this chapter; or

The partner’s right to compel a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business under W.S.

17-21-801

or enforce any other right under article 8 of this chapter.

Enforce the rights and otherwise protect the interests of the partner, including rights and interests arising independently of the partnership relationship.

The accrual of and any time limitation on a right of action for a remedy under this section is governed by other law. A right to an accounting upon a dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-407.
Continuation of partnership beyond definite term or particular undertaking.

If a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking is continued, without an express agreement, after the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, the rights and duties of the partners remain the same as they were at the expiration or completion, so far as is consistent with a partnership at will.

A continuation of the business by the partners or those of them who habitually acted in the business during the term or undertaking, without any settlement or liquidation of the partnership business, is prima facie evidence of an agreement that the business will not be wound up.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.